Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,135
Act, how cited.

Sections 83-170 to 83-1,135.05 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Treatment and Corrections Act.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 85, p. 3112;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 13, § 9;

Laws 1995, LB 371, § 25;

Laws 1997, LB 274, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 364, § 21;

Laws 1998, LB 309, § 28;

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 28;

Laws 2005, LB 538, § 24;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 99;

Laws 2011, LB675, § 11;

Laws 2013, LB44, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB598, § 32;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 105;

Laws 2016, LB867, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB1094, § 41;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 51;

Laws 2023, LB50, § 56;

Laws 2024, LB631, § 44.
July 19, 2024